Ohio, session 136, HB520.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) As used in this section, "taxing unit" has 7
the meaning defined in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code. 8
(B) The board of county commissioners of each county, or 9
the county executive, shall establish and convene a Blue Ribbon 10
Committee to do all of the following: 11
(1) Review and assess each taxing unit within the county 12
to determine the taxing districts and levying entities most able 13
to combine and consolidate operations for taxpayer savings; 14
(2) Review and assess each county program or department to 15
identify duplication of services and generally to streamline and 16
improve county efficiency and effectiveness; 17
(3) Review and assess each public service and district, 18
including water, sewer, health, park, and cemetery, to identify 19

H. B. No. 520 Page 2
As Introduced
duplication of services and ability for consolidation. 20
(C) The Blue Ribbon Committee shall consist of all of the 21
following: 22
(1) The three members of the board of county 23
commissioners, or, in the case of a county with an appointed or 24
elected county executive, the county executive and two residents 25
of the county appointed by the executive, with the approval of 26
the legislative authority of the county; 27
(2) The county auditor, or the official acting in that 28
capacity; 29
(3) The mayor of each municipal corporation that levies an 30
income tax, and which is located, in whole or in part, within 31
the county; 32
(4) A township trustee, for each township that is located 33
in whole or in part within the county, selected by the board of 34
township trustees; 35
(5) The superintendent of any school district and 36
educational service center that is located in whole or in part 37
within the county. 38
(D) Members of the Blue Ribbon Committee are not entitled 39
to compensation for service on the Committee, but may be 40
reimbursed, by the county, for their actual and necessary 41
expenses that are incurred in the discharge of duties on the 42
Committee. 43
(E) The Blue Ribbon Committee shall, not later than one 44
year after the effective date of this act, prepare a report of 45
its recommendations for combining taxing entities, sharing 46
services, and executing programs more efficiently. The report 47

H. B. No. 520 Page 3
As Introduced
shall be published on the internet web site of the county, and 48
shall be submitted to the General Assembly under division (B) of 49
section 101.68 of the Revised Code. 50